California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(D) In a case where the real estate escrow person provides “assistance” in complying with the withholding requirements of this subdivision, it shall be unlawful for the real estate escrow person to charge any customer a fee that exceeds forty-five dollars ($45).

(8) For purposes of this subdivision, “sales price” means the sum of all of the following:

(A) The cash paid, or to be paid, but excluding for this purpose any stated or unstated interest or original issue discount, as determined under Sections 1271 through 1275, inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) The fair market value of other property transferred, or to be transferred.

(C) The
 outstanding amount of any liability assumed by the transferee or to which the California real property interest is subject immediately before and after the transfer.

(9) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe, by forms, instructions, published notices, or regulations, any requirements necessary for the efficient administration of this subdivision relating to the treatment of “de minimis” amounts otherwise required under this section.

(f) Withholding is not required under this section with respect to wages, salaries, fees, or other compensation paid by a corporation for services performed in California for that corporation to a nonresident corporate director for director services, including attendance at a board of directors’ meeting.

(g) In the case of any payment described in subdivision (f), the person making the
 payment shall do each of the following:

(1) File a return with the Franchise Tax Board at the time and in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) Provide the payee with a statement at the time and in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board.

(h) (1) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 488 of the Statutes of 2002 apply to dispositions of California real property interests that occur on or after January 1, 2003.

(2) In the case of any payments received on or after January 1, 2003, pursuant to an installment sale agreement relating to a disposition occurring before January 1, 2003, the amendments to this section made by Chapter 488 of the Statutes of 2002 do not apply to those
 payments.

(i) (1) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to dispositions of California real property interests that occur on or after January 1, 2009.

(2) In the case of any payments received on or after January 1, 2009, pursuant to an installment sale agreement relating to a disposition occurring before January 1, 2009, the amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision do not apply to those payments.

(j) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to dispositions of California real property interests that occur on or after January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 66, Sec. 1.   (AB 1582)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

18663.

(a) (1) The Franchise Tax Board shall annually (or more often if necessary) prepare and make available to the Employment Development Department, wage withholding tables that shall be used by every employer making payment of any wages to a resident employee for services performed either within or without this state; or to a nonresident employee for services performed in this state,
 to deduct and withhold from those wages for each payroll period, a tax computed in a manner as to produce, so far as practicable, with due regard to the credits for personal exemptions allowable under Section 17054, a sum that is substantially equivalent to the amount of tax reasonably estimated to be due under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) resulting from the inclusion in the gross income of the employee the wages which were subject to withholding.

(2) For wages paid on or after November 1, 2009, wage withholding tables prepared by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this subdivision shall produce, so far as practicable, with due regard to the credits for personal exemptions allowable under Section 17054, a sum that will significantly prevent underwithholding by using an amount equal to 10 percent more than the sum described in paragraph (1).

(b) (1) (A) For supplemental wages paid on or after January 1, 1992, the rate of withholding that may be applied to supplemental wages in lieu of the wage withholding tables specified in subdivision (a) shall be 6 percent.

(B) For supplemental wages paid on or after November 1, 2009, the rate of withholding shall be 6.6 percent.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “supplemental wages” includes, but is not limited to, bonus payments, overtime payments, commissions, sales awards, back pay including retroactive wage increases, and reimbursements for nondeductible moving expenses that are paid for the same or a different period, or without regard to a particular period.

(c) (1) For stock options and bonus payments that constitute wages paid on or after January 1,
 2002, the rate of withholding that may be applied to those stock options and bonus payments in lieu of the wage withholding tables specified in subdivision (a) shall, notwithstanding subdivision (b), be 9.3 percent.

(2) For stock options and bonus payments that constitute wages paid on or after November 1, 2009, the rate of withholding shall be 10.23 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 15, Sec. 1.   (AB 17 4x)   Effective October 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18664.

(a) (1) Section 3406 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the backup withholding, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) For purposes of this section, the term “reportable payment,” as defined in Section 3406(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall include payments of items of income as defined in Section 18662, and any regulations thereunder, with respect to rents,
 prizes and winnings, compensation for services, including bonuses, and other fixed or determinable annual or periodic gains, profits, and income.

(3) This section shall not apply to either of the following:

(A) Payment of interest and dividends.

(B) Any release of loan funds made by a financial institution in the normal course of business.

(4) For the purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3), “financial institution” means any of the following:

(A) A depository institution, as defined in Section 1813(c) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(B) An institution-affiliated party, as defined in Section 1813(u) of Title 12 of
 the United States Code.

(C) Any federal credit union or state credit union, as defined in Section 1752 of Title 12 of the United States Code, including an institution-affiliated party of a credit union, as defined in Section 1786(r) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(b) The amount of tax to be withheld shall be computed by applying a rate of 7 percent to the reportable payment.

(c) Where withholding under both this section and other provisions of this article would otherwise be required, withholding shall only be required under this section.

(d) Any payer required to withhold tax pursuant to this section shall notify the payee of such withholding at a time and in a manner as may be prescribed in forms and instructions by the Franchise Tax
 Board.

(e) This section shall apply to payments made on or after January 1, 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 16, Sec. 3.   (AB 18 4x)   Effective January 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18665.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the provisions of any law effecting changes in withholding shall apply to withholding in the calendar year succeeding the year the provision was chaptered, or in the calendar year the provision is operative, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 191, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

18666.

(a) Section 1446 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to withholding of tax on foreign partners’ share of effectively connected income, shall apply to the extent that the amounts represent income from California sources, except as otherwise provided.

(b) (1) The rate of tax referred to in Section 1446(b)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be the maximum tax rate specified in Sections 17041 and 17043, as applicable, rather than the rate specified in Section 1 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) The rate of tax referred to in Section 1446(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be the rate specified in Section 23151, 23181, or 23183, as applicable, rather than the rate
 specified in Section 11 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) Section 1446(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for withholding on dispositions of partnership interests, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 31.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

18667.

The Franchise Tax Board may require employers to submit copies of income tax withholding exemption certificates. If the Franchise Tax Board determines that a certificate is invalid for state income tax purposes, the Franchise Tax Board shall notify the employer and the affected employee of its determination. An employee who disagrees with the Franchise Tax Board’s determination may request review of the determination by filing a written petition in the form and within the time prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. After review, the
 Franchise Tax Board shall give written notification of its decision to both the employer and the employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18668.

(a) Every person required under this article to deduct and withhold any tax is hereby made liable for that tax, to the extent provided by this section. Any amount required to be deducted and paid to the Franchise Tax Board under this article shall be considered the tax of that person. Unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause, any person who fails to withhold from any payments any amount required to be withheld under this article or who fails to transmit the withheld
 amounts to the Franchise Tax Board on or before the due date required by regulations is liable for the amount actually withheld, or the amount of taxes due from the taxpayer to whom the payments are made, whichever is greater, but not in excess of the amount required to be withheld.

(b) If any amount required to be withheld under this article is not paid to the Franchise Tax Board on or before the due date required by regulations, interest shall be assessed at the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521, computed from the due date to the date paid.

(c) Whenever any person has withheld any amount pursuant to this article, the amount so withheld shall be held to be a special fund in trust for the State of California.

(d) In lieu of the amount provided for in subdivision (a), unless it is shown that
 the failure to withhold is due to reasonable cause, whenever any transferee is required to withhold any amount pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 18662, the transferee is liable for the greater of the following amounts for failure to withhold only after the transferee, as specified, is notified in writing of the requirements under subdivision (e) of Section 18662:

(1) Five hundred dollars ($500).

(2) Ten percent of the amount required to be withheld under subdivision (e) of Section 18662.

(e) (1) Unless it is shown that the failure to notify is due to reasonable cause, the real estate escrow person is liable for the amount specified in subdivision (d), when written notification of the withholding requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 18662 is not provided to the transferee, other than a
 transferee that is an intermediary or accommodator in a deferred exchange, and the California real property disposition is subject to withholding under subdivision (e) of Section 18662.

(2) The real estate escrow person shall provide written notification to the transferee (other than a transferee that is an intermediary or accommodator in a deferred exchange) in substantially the same form as follows:

“In accordance with Section 18662 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a buyer may be required to withhold an amount equal to 313 percent of the sales price or the amount that is specified in a written certificate executed by the transferor in the case of a disposition of California real property interest by either:

1. A seller who is an
 individual, trust, or estate or when the disbursement instructions authorize the proceeds to be sent to a financial intermediary of the seller, OR

2. A corporate or partnership seller that has no permanent place of business in California immediately after the transfer of title to the California real property.

The buyer may become subject to penalty for failure to withhold an amount equal to the greater of 10 percent of the amount required to be withheld or five hundred dollars ($500).

However, notwithstanding any other provision included in the California statutes referenced above, no buyer will be required to withhold any amount or be subject to penalty for failure to withhold if:

1. The sales price of the California real property conveyed does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000),
 OR

2. The seller executes a written certificate, under the penalty of perjury, certifying that the seller is a corporation or a partnership with a permanent place of business in California, OR

3. The seller, who is an individual, trust, estate, partnership, or a corporation without a permanent place of business in California executes a written certificate, under the penalty of perjury, of any of the following:

A. The California real property being conveyed is the seller’s or decedent’s principal residence, within the meaning of Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code.

B. The last use of the property being conveyed was use by the transferor as the transferor’s principal residence within the meaning of Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code.

C. The California real property being conveyed is or will be exchanged for property of like kind, within the meaning of Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, but only to the extent of the amount of gain not required to be recognized for California income tax purposes under Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code.

D. The California real property has been compulsorily or involuntarily converted, within the meaning of Section 1033 of the Internal Revenue Code, and that the seller intends to acquire property similar or related in service or use so as to be eligible for nonrecognition of gain for California income tax purposes under Section 1033 of the Internal Revenue Code.

E. The California real property transaction will result in a loss or a net gain not required to be recognized for California income tax
 purposes.

The seller is subject to penalty for knowingly filing a fraudulent certificate for the purpose of avoiding the withholding requirement.”

(3) The real estate escrow person is not liable under this subdivision if the tax due as a result of the disposition of California real property is paid by the original or extended due date of the transferor’s return for the taxable year in which the disposition occurred.

(4) The real estate escrow person or transferee is not liable under paragraph (1) or subdivision (d), if the failure to withhold is the result of his or her reliance, based on good faith and on all the information of which he or she has knowledge, upon a written certificate executed by the transferor under penalty of perjury pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 18662.

(5) Any transferor who for the purpose of avoiding the withholding requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 18662 knowingly executes a false certificate pursuant to that section is liable for twice the amount specified in subdivision (d).

(f) The amount of tax required to be deducted, withheld, and remitted under this article shall be assessed, collected, and paid upon notice and demand. Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031), relating to deficiency assessments, shall not apply with respect to the assessment or collection of any amount due under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 305, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18669.

(a) Whenever any payer required to deduct and withhold tax under this article sells, transfers, dissolves, withdraws, terminates, or otherwise disposes of the business or a substantial portion of its assets, the successors (including assigns, purchasers, heirs, distributees, beneficiaries, or other persons acquiring either a substantial portion of the assets or the business) shall withhold in trust a sufficient part of the purchase price or set aside in trust money or property to cover the amount of the taxes
 required to be withheld and any interest or penalties with respect thereto which are due or unpaid by the payer. The money, property or portion of the purchase price shall be held in trust until a certificate is issued by the Franchise Tax Board stating that no amount of such tax, interest, or penalties are due or unpaid from the payer.

(b) Upon written request by the successor, the Franchise Tax Board shall, within 60 days, issue a certificate or a statement showing the amount of tax, interest, and penalties due from the payer. Except as provided in subdivision (c), failure to issue a certificate or statement within the 60-day period shall be deemed equivalent to the issuance of a certificate stating that no tax, interest, or penalties are due. If the Franchise Tax Board issues a statement showing that taxes, interest, and penalties are claimed to be due, the amount stated therein (not in excess of the fair market value of the assets or
 business acquired) shall be paid by the successor to the Franchise Tax Board within (1) 30 days after the statement is mailed or delivered to the successor, or (2) on the day the business or assets are acquired, whichever occurs last. If a request for a certificate is not made by the successor, the amount of tax, interest, or penalties due or unpaid by the payer shall be paid by the successor to the Franchise Tax Board on the day the business or assets are acquired. If a successor fails to pay the amount required by this section by the time prescribed in this subdivision, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount payable shall be levied.

(c) The issuance of a certificate stating that no taxes, interest, and penalties are due, or the failure to issue the certificate or statement within the period of 60 days shall not release the payer from liability on account of any taxes, interest, and penalties then or thereafter determined to be due from him or
 her, but shall release the successor from any further liability on account of any such taxes, interest, and penalties. Payment by the successor pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not release the payer from liability except to the extent of the amount paid by the successor.

(d) Any successor that fails to withhold money or other property or fails to pay the amount or value of the property withheld as provided in this section shall be personally liable for the payment of the taxes, interest, and penalties due from the payer up to but not exceeding the fair market value of the assets or business acquired. The Franchise Tax Board shall have all of the remedies for collection against any successor that acquires the business or substantially all the assets thereof of a payer as provided by this part against any payer liable for taxes, interest, and penalties. The time within which the obligation may be enforced against the successor acquiring the
 business or substantially all the assets thereof of a payer shall commence from (1) the date the successor acquires the assets or business, (2) the date an assessment against the successor payer becomes final, or (3) 31 days after the statement is mailed or delivered to the successor if a certificate is requested by the successor as provided in subdivision (b), whichever of the three events is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18670.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may by notice, served personally or by first-class mail, require any employer, person, officer or department of the state, political subdivision or agency of the state, including the Regents of the University of California, a city organized under a freeholders’ charter, or a political body not a subdivision or agency of the state, having in their possession, or under their control, any credits or other personal property or other things of value, belonging to a taxpayer or to an employer or person who has
 failed to withhold and transmit amounts due pursuant to this article, to withhold, from the credits or other personal property or other things of value, the amount of any tax, interest, or penalties due from the taxpayer or the amount of any liability incurred by that employer or person for failure to withhold and transmit amounts due from a taxpayer under this part and to transmit the amount withheld to the Franchise Tax Board at the times that it may designate. However, in the case of a depository institution, as defined in Section 19(b) of the Federal Reserve Act (12 U.S.C.A. Sec. 461(b)(1)(A)), amounts due from a taxpayer under this part shall be transmitted to the Franchise Tax Board not less than 10 business days from receipt of the notice. To be effective, the notice shall state the amount due from the taxpayer and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office reported in information returns filed with the Franchise Tax Board, or the branch or office where the credits or other property is held,
 unless another branch or office is designated by the employer, person, officer or department of the state, political subdivision or agency of the state, including the Regents of the University of California, a city organized under a freeholders’ charter or a political body not a subdivision or agency of the state.

(b) (1) At least 45 days before sending a notice to withhold to the address indicated on the information return, the Franchise Tax Board shall request a depository institution to do either of the following:

(A) Verify that the address on its information return is its designated address for receiving notices to withhold.

(B) Provide the Franchise Tax Board with a designated address for receiving notices to withhold.

(2) Once the depository institution has specified a designated address pursuant to paragraph (1), the Franchise Tax Board shall send all notices to that address unless the depository institution provides notification of another address. The Franchise Tax Board shall send all notices to withhold to a new designated address 30 days after notification.

(3) Failure to verify or provide a designated address within 30 days of receiving the request shall be deemed verification of the address on the information return as the depository institution’s designated address.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 8112 of the Commercial Code and Section 700.130 of the Code of Civil Procedure, when the Franchise Tax Board, pursuant to this section or Section 18670.5, issues a levy upon, or requires by notice, any person, financial institution, or securities
 intermediary, as applicable, to withhold all, or a portion of, a financial asset for the purpose of collecting a delinquent tax liability, the person, financial institution, or securities intermediary, as defined in Section 8102 of the Commercial Code, that maintains, administers, or manages that asset on behalf of the taxpayer, or has the legal authority to accept instructions from the taxpayer as to the disposition of that asset, shall liquidate the financial asset in a commercially reasonable manner within 90 days of the issuance of the order to withhold. Within five days of liquidation, the person, financial institution, or securities intermediary, as applicable, shall remit to the Franchise Tax Board the proceeds of the liquidation, less any reasonable commissions or fees, or both, which are charged in the normal course of business.

(2) If the value of the financial assets to be liquidated exceeds the tax liability, the taxpayer may,
 within 60 days after the service of the order to withhold upon the person, financial institution, or securities intermediary, instruct the person, financial institution, or securities intermediary as to which financial assets are to be sold to satisfy the tax liability. If the taxpayer does not provide instructions for liquidation, the person, financial institution, or securities intermediary shall liquidate the financial assets in a commercially reasonable manner and in an amount sufficient to cover the tax liability, and any reasonable commissions or fees, or both, which are charged in the normal course of business, beginning with the financial assets purchased most recently.

(3) For purposes of this section, a financial asset shall include, but not be limited to, an uncertificated security, certificated security, or security entitlement as defined in Section 8102 of the Commercial Code, a security as defined in Section 8103 of the Commercial
 Code, or a securities account as defined in Section 8501 of the Commercial Code.

(d) Any corporation or person failing to withhold the amounts due from any taxpayer and transmit them to the Franchise Tax Board after service of the notice shall be liable for those amounts. However, in the case of a depository institution, if a notice to withhold is mailed to the branch where the account is located or principal banking office, the depository institution shall be liable for a failure to withhold only to the extent that the accounts can be identified in information normally maintained at that location in the ordinary course of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 349, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

18670.5.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may by notice, served by magnetic media, electronic transmission, or other electronic technology, require any depository institution, as defined in Section 19 (b) of the Federal Reserve Act (12 U.S.C.A. Sec. 461(b)(1)(A)), that the Franchise Tax Board, in its sole discretion, has reason to believe may have in its possession, or under its control, any credits or other personal property or other things of value, belonging to a taxpayer, to withhold, from the credits or other personal property or other things of
 value, the amount of any tax, interest, or penalties due from the taxpayer and transmit that amount withheld to the Franchise Tax Board at the times that it may designate, but not less than 10 business days from receipt of the notice. The notice shall state the amount due from the taxpayer and shall be delivered or transmitted to the branch or office reported in the information returns filed with the Franchise Tax Board, or the branch or office where the credits or other property is held, or other address designated by that depository institution for purposes of the Franchise Tax Board serving notice by magnetic media, electronic transmission, or other electronic technology.

(b) Any depository institution failing to withhold the amount due from the taxpayer and to transmit that amount to the Franchise Tax Board after the Franchise Tax Board provides notice to the depository institution as authorized by subdivision (a) shall be liable for those
 amounts only to the extent that the depository institution can identify the account by magnetic media, electronic transmission, or other electronic technology.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “address” shall include telephone or modem number, facsimile number, or any other number designated by the depository institution to receive data by electronic means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18671.

(a) Subject to the limitations in subdivisions (b) and (c), the Franchise Tax Board, may, by notice, served personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology, require any person, officer, department of the state, or political subdivision or agency of the state including the Regents of the University of California, a city organized under a freeholder’s charter, or a political body not a subdivision or agency of the state, to withhold the amount of any tax, interest, or penalties due from a taxpayer, or the amount due from an employer or person who has failed to withhold and transmit amounts due pursuant to this article, from any payments due the taxpayer, employer,
 or person and from any payments becoming due the taxpayer, employer, or person after receipt of the notice. The amounts withheld shall be transmitted to the Franchise Tax Board at those times as it may designate.

(b) The effect of a levy made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be continuous from the date the notice is received until the amount due stated on the notice has been withheld, until the notice has been withdrawn, or until one year after the date the notice is received, whichever occurs first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld pursuant to a notice issued under subdivision (a) is the lesser of the amount due stated on the notice, or either of the following:

(1) If the taxpayer, employer, or person is not a
 natural person, 100 percent of the amount of each payment due or becoming due the taxpayer, employer, or person during the period the levy is in effect as provided in subdivision (b).

(2) If the taxpayer, employer, or person is a natural person, 25 percent of the amount of each payment due or becoming due the taxpayer, employer, or person during the period the levy is in effect as provided in subdivision (b).

(d) Any notice or document required to be served or provided in connection with the notice to withhold described in subdivision (a) may be served personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(e) Upon consent, the Franchise Tax Board may provide service by electronic transmission or other electronic technology under this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, the term “payments” does not include earnings as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 706.011 of the Code of Civil Procedure or funds in a deposit account as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. The term “payments” does include any of the following:

(1) Payments due for services of
 independent contractors, dividends, rents, royalties, residuals, patent rights, or mineral or other natural resource rights.

(2) Payments or credits due or becoming due as a result of written or oral contracts for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(3) Any other payments or credits due or becoming due periodically as a result of an enforceable obligation to the taxpayer, employer, or person.

(g) The amendments
 made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to notices served or provided on or after the effective date of the act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 297, Sec. 1.   (AB 3372)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18672.

Any employer or person failing to withhold the amount due from any taxpayer and to transmit the same to the Franchise Tax Board after service of a notice pursuant to Section 18670 or 18671 is liable for those amounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18673.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 7 (commencing with Section 706.151) of Chapter 5 of Title 9 of Part II of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the Franchise Tax Board determines upon receiving information from the taxpayer that his or her employer withheld earnings for taxes pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 19251) of Chapter 5 and failed to remit the withheld earnings to the Franchise Tax Board, the employer shall be liable for the amount not remitted. The Franchise Tax Board’s determination shall be based on payroll documents or
 other substantiating evidence furnished by the taxpayer.

(b) Upon its determination, the Franchise Tax Board shall mail notice to the employer at its last known address that upon failure to remit the withheld earnings to the Franchise Tax Board within 15 days of the date of its notice to the employer, the employer shall be liable for that amount which was withheld and not remitted.

(c) If the employer fails to remit the amount withheld to the Franchise Tax Board upon notice, that amount for which the employer is liable shall be assessed, collected, and paid as though it were a tax deficiency. The amount may be assessed at any time prior to seven years from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld. Interest shall accrue on that amount from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld.

(d) When the assessment against the employer is final and due and payable, the taxpayer’s account shall be immediately credited with an amount equal to that assessed amount as though it were a payment received by the Franchise Tax Board on the first date that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld by the employer.

(e) Collection against the taxpayer is stayed for both the following amount and period:

(1) An amount equal to the amount determined by the Franchise Tax Board under subdivision (a).

(2) The earlier of the time the credit is applied to the taxpayer’s account pursuant to subdivision (d) or the assessment against the employer is withdrawn or revised and the taxpayer is notified by the Franchise Tax Board thereof.

(f) If under this section an amount that was withheld and not remitted to the Franchise Tax Board is final and due and payable by the employer and credited to the taxpayer’s account, this remedy shall be the exclusive remedy for the taxpayer to recover that amount from the employer.

(g) This section shall not apply to debts, obligations, or other amounts for which an earnings withholding order or assignment is issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Article 5, 5.5, or 6 of Chapter 5 or Section 10878.

(h) This section shall apply to determinations made by the Franchise Tax Board on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 8.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18674.

(a) Any employer or person required to withhold and transmit any amount pursuant to this article shall comply with the requirement without resort to any legal or equitable action in a court of law or equity. Any employer or person paying to the Franchise Tax Board any amount required by it to be withheld is not liable therefor to the person from whom withheld unless the amount withheld is refunded to the withholding agent. However, if a depository institution, as defined in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 461(b)(1)(A) withholds
 and pays to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this article any moneys held in a deposit account in which the delinquent taxpayer and another person or persons have an interest, or in an account held in the name of a third party or parties in which the delinquent taxpayer is ultimately determined to have no interest, the depository institution paying those moneys to the Franchise Tax Board is not liable therefor to any of the persons who have an interest in the account, unless the amount withheld is refunded to the withholding agent.

(b) In the case of a deposit account or accounts for which this notice to withhold applies, the depository institution shall send a notice by first-class mail to each person named on the account or accounts included in the notice from the Franchise Tax Board, provided that a current address for each person is available to the institution. This notice shall inform each person as to the reason for the hold placed on
 the account or accounts, the amount subject to being withheld, and the date by which this amount is to be remitted to the Franchise Tax Board. An institution may assess the account or accounts of each person receiving this notice a reasonable service charge not to exceed three dollars ($3).

(c) Any employer or person required under this article to withhold payments from a taxpayer may file an action in interpleader when a bona fide dispute has arisen as to priority of lien between the tax levied under this part and that of a federal taxing agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18675.

Any person from whom a tax is collected by withholding under this article or under Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is entitled to the remedies set forth in Articles 1 (commencing with Section 19301) and 3 (commencing with Section 19381) of Chapter 6. Any refund of the tax under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 19301) shall be made to the withholding agent instead of directly to the taxpayer, if requested in writing by the withholding agent at the time the amounts refundable were transmitted to the Franchise Tax
 Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18676.

Whenever, under any provision of this article, service is authorized upon the state of any notice to withhold, unless expressly exempted from the provisions of this section, the service to be effective must, in addition to any other requirements, be made on the state agency owing the obligation prior to the time the agency presents the claim for payment thereof to the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18677.

(a) For purposes of this article, if a lender, surety, or other person, who is not an employer under those sections with respect to an employee or group of employees, pays wages directly to such an employee or group of employees, employed by one or more employers, or to an agent on behalf of the employee or employees, the lender, surety, or other person shall be liable in his or her own person and estate to this state in a sum equal to the taxes (together with interest) required to be deducted and withheld from
 the wages by the employer.
